Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8.3 Uncompensated Care

40-8.3-1.
Declaration of purpose.

The legislature hereby finds and declares that preservation of the ability of the private acute-care hospital system of the state to continue to support an increasing uncompensated care burden is of critical importance to the public health and welfare of the citizens of Rhode Island and that implementation of § 1923 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396r-4, which permits the federal government to share in the provision of payments to hospitals that provide a significant amount of uncompensated care, is an effective way for the state to assist the hospitals in continuing to provide uncompensated care.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 42, § 1.

40-8.3-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Base year” means, for the purpose of calculating a disproportionate share payment for any fiscal year ending after September 30, 2021, the period from October 1, 2019, through September 30, 2020, and for any fiscal year ending after September 30, 2022, the period from October 1, 2019, through September 30, 2020.

“Medicaid inpatient utilization rate for a hospital” means a fraction (expressed as a percentage), the numerator of which is the hospital’s number of inpatient days during the base year attributable to patients who were eligible for medical assistance during the base year and the denominator of which is the total number of the hospital’s inpatient days in the base year.

“Participating hospital” means any nongovernment and nonpsychiatric hospital that:

Was licensed as a hospital in accordance with chapter 17 of title 23 during the base year and shall mean the actual facilities and buildings in existence in Rhode Island, licensed pursuant to §

23-17-1

et seq. on June 30, 2010, and thereafter any premises included on that license, regardless of changes in licensure status pursuant to chapter 17.14 of title 23 (hospital conversions) and § 23-17-6(b) (change in effective control), that provides short-term, acute inpatient and/or outpatient care to persons who require definitive diagnosis and treatment for injury, illness, disabilities, or pregnancy. Notwithstanding the preceding language, the negotiated Medicaid managed care payment rates for a court-approved purchaser that acquires a hospital through receivership, special mastership, or other similar state insolvency proceedings (which court-approved purchaser is issued a hospital license after January 1, 2013), shall be based upon the newly negotiated rates between the court-approved purchaser and the health plan, and the rates shall be effective as of the date that the court-approved purchaser and the health plan execute the initial agreement containing the newly negotiated rate. The rate-setting methodology for inpatient hospital payments and outpatient hospital payments set forth in §§ 40-8-13.4(b)(1)(ii)(C) and

40-8-13.4(b)(2)

, respectively, shall thereafter apply to negotiated increases for each annual twelve-month (12) period as of July 1 following the completion of the first full year of the court-approved purchaser’s initial Medicaid managed care contract;

Achieved a medical assistance inpatient utilization rate of at least one percent (1%) during the base year; and

Continues to be licensed as a hospital in accordance with chapter 17 of title 23 during the payment year.

“Uncompensated-care costs” means, as to any hospital, the sum of: (i) The cost incurred by the hospital during the base year for inpatient or outpatient services attributable to charity care (free care and bad debts) for which the patient has no health insurance or other third-party coverage less payments, if any, received directly from such patients; and (ii) The cost incurred by the hospital during the base year for inpatient or outpatient services attributable to Medicaid beneficiaries less any Medicaid reimbursement received therefor; multiplied by the uncompensated-care index.

“Uncompensated-care index” means the annual percentage increase for hospitals established pursuant to §

27-19-14

[repealed] for each year after the base year, up to and including the payment year; provided, however, that the uncompensated-care index for the payment year ending September 30, 2007, shall be deemed to be five and thirty-eight hundredths percent (5.38%), and that the uncompensated-care index for the payment year ending September 30, 2008, shall be deemed to be five and forty-seven hundredths percent (5.47%), and that the uncompensated-care index for the payment year ending September 30, 2009, shall be deemed to be five and thirty-eight hundredths percent (5.38%), and that the uncompensated-care index for the payment years ending September 30, 2010, September 30, 2011, September 30, 2012, September 30, 2013, September 30, 2014, September 30, 2015, September 30, 2016, September 30, 2017, September 30, 2018, September 30, 2019, September 30, 2020, September 30, 2021, September 30, 2022, and September 30, 2023, shall be deemed to be five and thirty hundredths percent (5.30%).

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 42, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 21, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 25, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 21, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 12, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 14; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 7, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 9, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 6; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 12, § 3, effective July 1, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 12, § 3, effective July 1, 2022.

40-8.3-3.
Implementation.

For federal fiscal year 2021, commencing on October 1, 2020, and ending September 30, 2021, the executive office of health and human services shall submit to the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services a state plan amendment to the Rhode Island Medicaid DSH Plan to provide:

That the DSH Plan to all participating hospitals, not to exceed an aggregate limit of $142.5 million, shall be allocated by the executive office of health and human services to the Pool D component of the DSH Plan; and

That the Pool D allotment shall be distributed among the participating hospitals in direct proportion to the individual participating hospital’s uncompensated-care costs for the base year, inflated by the uncompensated-care index to the total uncompensated-care costs for the base year inflated by the uncompensated-care index for all participating hospitals. The disproportionate share payments shall be made on or before July 12, 2021, and are expressly conditioned upon approval on or before July 5, 2021, by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, or his or her authorized representative, of all Medicaid state plan amendments necessary to secure for the state the benefit of federal financial participation in federal fiscal year 2021 for the disproportionate share payments.

For federal fiscal year 2022, commencing on October 1, 2021, and ending September 30, 2022, the executive office of health and human services shall submit to the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services a state plan amendment to the Rhode Island Medicaid DSH Plan to provide:

That the DSH Plan to all participating hospitals, not to exceed an aggregate limit of $145.1 million, shall be allocated by the executive office of health and human services to the Pool D component of the DSH Plan; and

That the Pool D allotment shall be distributed among the participating hospitals in direct proportion to the individual participating hospital’s uncompensated-care costs for the base year, inflated by the uncompensated-care index to the total uncompensated-care costs for the base year inflated by the uncompensated-care index for all participating hospitals. The disproportionate share payments shall be made on or before June 30, 2022, and are expressly conditioned upon approval on or before July 5, 2022, by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, or his or her authorized representative, of all Medicaid state plan amendments necessary to secure for the state the benefit of federal financial participation in federal fiscal year 2022 for the disproportionate share payments.

For federal fiscal year 2023, commencing on October 1, 2022, and ending September 30, 2023, the executive office of health and human services shall submit to the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services a state plan amendment to the Rhode Island Medicaid DSH Plan to provide:

That the DSH Plan to all participating hospitals, not to exceed an aggregate limit of $145.1 million, shall be allocated by the executive office of health and human services to the Pool D component of the DSH Plan; and

That the Pool D allotment shall be distributed among the participating hospitals in direct proportion to the individual participating hospital’s uncompensated-care costs for the base year, inflated by the uncompensated-care index to the total uncompensated-care costs for the base year inflated by the uncompensated-care index for all participating hospitals. The disproportionate share payments shall be made on or before June 15, 2023, and are expressly conditioned upon approval on or before June 23, 2023, by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, or his or her authorized representative, of all Medicaid state plan amendments necessary to secure for the state the benefit of federal financial participation in federal fiscal year 2023 for the disproportionate share payments.

No provision is made pursuant to this chapter for disproportionate-share hospital payments to participating hospitals for uncompensated-care costs related to graduate medical education programs.

The executive office of health and human services is directed, on at least a monthly basis, to collect patient-level uninsured information, including, but not limited to, demographics, services rendered, and reason for uninsured status from all hospitals licensed in Rhode Island.

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 6.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 42, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 21, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 31, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 25, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 21, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 12, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 14; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 7, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 9, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 6; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 12, § 3, effective July 1, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 12, § 3, effective July 1, 2022.

40-8.3-4.
Reports and audits.

As a condition of receipt of a payment under this chapter, each participating hospital shall submit to the department data, reports and/or independent certified audits as may be required by the department to timely comply with the requirements of Section 1923 of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396r-4, as amended, and any implementing regulations or directives duly promulgated by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 9, § 2.

40-8.3-5.
Hospital payments.

Due to the high ratio of unqualified uncompensated-care expenses to qualified uncompensated-care expenses, the department of human services is hereby authorized and directed to pay by September 1, 2010, from revenues derived from taxes imposed in accordance with §

44-17-1

: (1) Acute-care hospitals in Washington County the amount of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to South County Hospital, and seven hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) to The Westerly Hospital; (2) Any acute-care hospital in Kent County the amount of eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000); and (3) Miriam Hospital the amount of one million six hundred thousand dollars ($1,600,000). The department of human services is authorized and directed to pay four million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($4,750,000) during state fiscal year 2011 to the following hospitals: one million seven hundred seventy-eight thousand eight hundred forty-three dollars ($1,778,843) to Kent Hospital; six hundred and forty-two thousand three hundred forty dollars ($642,340) to Saint Joseph’s Hospital; one million one hundred thirty-one thousand, nine hundred twenty-nine dollars ($1,131,929) to Miriam Hospital; four hundred thirty-eight thousand and four hundred eighty-two dollars ($438,482) to South County Hospital; two hundred ninety seven thousand eight hundred and six dollars ($297,806) to Westerly Hospital; one hundred thirty-three thousand and six hundred seventy-two dollars ($133,672) to Newport Hospital; one hundred seventy thousand nine hundred and sixty-four dollars ($170,964) to Butler Hospital; and one hundred fifty-five thousand and nine hundred sixty-three dollars ($155,963) to Bradley Hospital of Rhode Island. The department of human services is authorized to pay five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to South County Hospital and five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to Westerly Hospital in state fiscal year 2012.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 19, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 20, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 18, § 3.

40-8.3-6.
Outpatient adjustment payments for fiscal year 2009.

Effective July 1, 2008, the department of human services is hereby authorized and directed to amend its regulations and the Rhode Island State Plan for Medical Assistance pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act for reimbursement to hospitals for outpatient service as follows:

Hospitals — Outpatient adjustment payments.

Each hospital in the state of Rhode Island, as defined in §

23-17-38.1

, shall receive an adjustment payment during state fiscal year 2009 of an amount determined as follows:

Determine the percent of the state’s total Medicaid outpatient and emergency department services (exclusive of physician services) provided by each hospital during the hospital’s fiscal year ending during 2007;

Determine the sum of all Medicaid payments to hospitals made for outpatient and emergency department services (exclusive of physician services) provided during each hospital’s fiscal year ending during 2007;

Multiply the sum of all Medicaid payments as determined in subsection (a)(2) by fifty-six and five hundredths percent (56.05%) and then multiply that result by each hospital’s percentage of the state’s total Medicaid outpatient and emergency department services as determined in subsection (a)(1) to obtain the total outpatient adjustment for each hospital to be paid in SFY 2009;

Pay each hospital on its total outpatient adjustment as determined in subsection (a)(3).

The amounts determined in subsection (a) are in addition to Medicaid outpatient payments and emergency services payments (exclusive of physician services) paid to hospitals in accordance with current state regulation and the Rhode Island Plan for Medicaid assistance pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act and are not subject to recoupment or settlement.

The payments are expressly conditioned upon approval by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, or his or her authorized representative, of any Medicaid state plan amendment necessary to secure for the state the benefit of federal financial participation in federal fiscal year 2009 for such payments, such amendment to be filed not later than July 9, 2008.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 19, § 2.

40-8.3-7.
Outpatient adjustment payments for fiscal year 2010.

Effective July 1, 2009, the department of human services is hereby authorized and directed to amend its regulations and the Rhode Island State Plan for Medical Assistance pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act for reimbursement to hospitals for outpatient services as follows:

Hospitals — Outpatient adjustment payments.

Each hospital in the state of Rhode Island, as defined in §

23-17-38.1

, shall receive a quarterly adjustment payment during state fiscal year 2010 of an amount determined as follows:

Determine the percent of the state’s total Medicaid outpatient and emergency department services (exclusive of physician services) provided by each hospital during the hospital’s fiscal year ending during 2008;

Determine the sum of all Medicaid payments to hospitals made for outpatient and emergency department services (exclusive of physician services) provided during each hospital’s fiscal year ending during 2008;

Multiply the sum of all Medicaid payments as determined in subsection (a)(2) by seventy-seven and forty-one hundredths percent (77.41%) and then multiply that result by each hospital’s percentage of the state’s total Medicaid outpatient and emergency department services as determined in subsection (a)(1) to obtain the total outpatient adjustment for each hospital to be paid in SFY 2010;

Pay each hospital on or about July 20, 2009, October 20, 2009, January 20, 2010, and April 20, 2010, one-quarter (.25) of its total outpatient adjustment as determined in subsection (a)(3).

The amounts determined in subsection (a) are in addition to Medicaid outpatient payments and emergency services payments (exclusive of physician services) paid to hospitals in accordance with current state regulation and the Rhode Island Plan for Medicaid Assistance pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act and are not subject to recoupment or settlement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 19, § 2.

40-8.3-8.
Outpatient adjustment payments for fiscal year 2011.

Effective July 1, 2010, the department of human services is hereby authorized and directed to amend its regulations for reimbursement to hospitals for outpatient services as follows:

Hospitals — Outpatient adjustment payments.

Each hospital in the state of Rhode Island, as defined in §

23-17-38.1

, shall receive a quarterly adjustment payment during state fiscal year 2011 of an amount determined as follows:

Determine the percent of the state’s total Medicaid outpatient and emergency department services (exclusive of physician services) provided by each hospital during each hospital’s fiscal year ending during 2009;

Determine the sum of all Medicaid payments to hospitals made for outpatient and emergency department services (exclusive of physician services) provided during each hospital’s fiscal year ending during 2009;

Multiply the sum of all Medicaid payments as determined in subsection (a)(2) by 82.95 percent and then multiply that result by each hospital’s percentage of the state’s total Medicaid outpatient and emergency department services as determined in subsection (a)(1) to obtain the total outpatient adjustment for each hospital to be paid in SFY 2011;

Pay each hospital on or before July 20, 2010, October 20, 2010, January 20, 2011, and April 20, 2011, one-quarter of its total outpatient adjustment as determined in subsection (a)(3).

The amounts determined in subsection (a) are in addition to Medicaid outpatient payments and emergency services payments (exclusive of physician services) paid to hospitals in accordance with current state regulation and the Rhode Island Plan for Medicaid Assistance pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act and are not subject to recoupment or settlement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 15, § 2.

40-8.3-9.
Outpatient adjustment payments for fiscal year 2012.

Effective July 1, 2011, the executive office of health and human services is hereby authorized and directed to amend its regulations for reimbursement to hospitals for outpatient services as follows:

Hospitals — Outpatient adjustment payments.

Each hospital in the state of Rhode Island, as defined in §

23-17-38.1

, shall receive a quarterly adjustment payment during state fiscal year 2012 of an amount determined as follows:

Determine the percent of the state’s total Medicaid outpatient and emergency department services (exclusive of physician services) provided by each hospital during each hospital’s fiscal year ending during 2010;

Determine the sum of all Medicaid payments to hospitals made for outpatient and emergency department services (exclusive of physician services) provided during each hospital’s fiscal year ending during 2010;

Multiply the sum of all Medicaid payments as determined in subsection (a)(2) by 72.57 percent and then multiply that result by each hospital’s percentage of the state’s total Medicaid outpatient and emergency department services as determined in subsection (a)(1) to obtain the total outpatient adjustment for each hospital to be paid in SFY 2012;

Pay each hospital on or before July 20, 2011, October 20, 2011, January 20, 2012, and April 20, 2012, one-quarter of its total outpatient adjustment as determined in subsection (a)(3).

The amounts determined in subsection (a) are in addition to Medicaid outpatient payments and emergency services payments (exclusive of physician services) paid to hospitals in accordance with current state regulation and the Rhode Island Plan for Medicaid Assistance pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act and are not subject to recoupment or settlement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 18, § 2.

40-8.3-10.
Hospital adjustment payments.

Effective July 1, 2021, and for each subsequent year, the executive office of health and human services is hereby authorized and directed to amend its regulations for reimbursement to hospitals for inpatient and outpatient services as follows:

Each hospital in the state of Rhode Island, as defined in §

23-17-38.1

, shall receive a quarterly outpatient adjustment payment each state fiscal year of an amount determined as follows:

Determine the percent of the state’s total Medicaid outpatient and emergency department services (exclusive of physician services) provided by each hospital during each hospital’s prior fiscal year;

Determine the sum of all Medicaid payments to hospitals made for outpatient and emergency department services (exclusive of physician services) provided during each hospital’s prior fiscal year;

Multiply the sum of all Medicaid payments as determined in subsection (a)(2) by a percentage defined as the total identified upper payment limit for all hospitals divided by the sum of all Medicaid payments as determined in subsection (a)(2); and then multiply that result by each hospital’s percentage of the state’s total Medicaid outpatient and emergency department services as determined in subsection (a)(1) to obtain the total outpatient adjustment for each hospital to be paid each year;

Pay each hospital on or before July 20, October 20, January 20, and April 20 one quarter (1/4) of its total outpatient adjustment as determined in subsection (a)(3).

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 6.]

Each hospital in the state of Rhode Island, as defined in §

23-17-38.1(d)(1)

, shall receive a quarterly inpatient adjustment payment each state fiscal year of an amount determined as follows:

Determine the percent of the state’s total Medicaid inpatient services (exclusive of physician services) provided by each hospital during each hospital’s prior fiscal year;

Determine the sum of all Medicaid payments to hospitals made for inpatient services (exclusive of physician services) provided during each hospital’s prior fiscal year;

Multiply the sum of all Medicaid payments as determined in subsection (c)(2) by a percentage defined as the total identified upper payment limit for all hospitals divided by the sum of all Medicaid payments as determined in subsection (c)(2); and then multiply that result by each hospital’s percentage of the state’s total Medicaid inpatient services as determined in subsection (c)(1) to obtain the total inpatient adjustment for each hospital to be paid each year;

Pay each hospital on or before July 20, October 20, January 20, and April 20 one quarter (1/4) of its total inpatient adjustment as determined in subsection (c)(3).

The amounts determined in subsections (a) and (c) are in addition to Medicaid inpatient and outpatient payments and emergency services payments (exclusive of physician services) paid to hospitals in accordance with current state regulation and the Rhode Island Plan for Medicaid Assistance pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act and are not subject to recoupment or settlement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 15, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 17, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 6; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 12, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.